Wyoming, session 2025, HB0286.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
HB0286

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0671

Section 1. W.S. 23-2-110 is created to read:

23-2-110. Mountain lion hunting season; prohibitions;
definitions.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(i) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of
mountain lions that may be taken by a person with a valid
license;

(ii) "Hunt area" means the area within a defined
geographic boundary where a person may take a mountain lion
with a valid license;

(iii) "Hunt area mortality limit" means the
number of mountain lions that may be taken within a hunt
area;

(iv) "Statewide mortality limit" means the
number of mountain lions that may be taken within the state
per year.
HB0286

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0671

(b) The mountain lion hunting season shall begin
September 1 and end August 31 of each year.

(c) For any mountain lion hunting season, the
commission shall not:

(i) Establish hunt areas;

(ii) Impose hunt area mortality limits,
statewide mortality limits or bag limits;

(iii) Impose hours that a person may take a
mountain lion with a valid license. A person may take a
mountain lion with a valid license during any hour of the
day.

(d) Any person with a valid antelope, deer or elk
license may take a mountain lion without a valid mountain
lion license.

HB0286

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0671
Section 2. W.S. 23-1-302(a)(ii) and by creating a new
paragraph (xxxiv), 23-3-102(d), 23-3-109(a) and 23-3-304(a)
are amended to read:

23-1-302. Powers and duties.

(a) The commission is directed and empowered:

(ii) To establish zones and areas in which
trophy game animals except mountain lions as provided by
W.S. 23-2-110 may be taken as game animals with a license
or, with the exception of gray wolves, in the same manner
as predatory animals without a license, giving proper
regard to the livestock and game industries in those
particular areas;

(xxxiv) To establish possession tags to be
provided to a person who killed a mountain lion with a
valid license before the skull and pelt of the mountain
lion may be sold, gifted or mounted.

23-3-102. Taking certain game animals without license
or during a closed season prohibited.
HB0286

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0671

(d) Any person who knowingly takes any antlered elk,
antlered deer, antlered moose, horned antelope, bighorn
sheep, mountain goat, mountain lion, grizzly bear or black
bear without the proper license or during a closed season
and any person who knowingly kills a mountain lion during a
mountain lion pursuit season, except as otherwise permitted
by this act, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) nor
more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment
for not more than one (1) year, or both. A third or
subsequent conviction within ten (10) years for a violation
of this subsection shall constitute a felony punishable by
a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)
nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00),
imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or both. For
the purposes of determining whether a violation of this
subsection is a felony, convictions resulting from the same
occurrence shall be considered a single conviction even if
the result of the occurrence is more than one (1)
misdemeanor conviction. The provisions of W.S. 6-8-101(a)
shall not apply to convictions under this section.

HB0286

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0671
23-3-109. Use of dogs; dogs injuring big or trophy
game animals may be killed; citation of owners of dogs
harassing game animals; penalties; leashed dogs for
tracking.

(a) No person shall use any dog to hunt, run or
harass any big or trophy game animal, protected animal or
furbearing animal except as otherwise provided by this act.
The commission shall regulate the use of dogs to take
mountain lions and bobcats by residents and nonresidents
during hunting or trapping seasons. The commission shall
regulate the use of dogs to pursue mountain lions by
residents during hunting or trapping seasons.

23-3-304. Certain trapping devices unlawful; game for
bait prohibited; baiting big game animals prohibited;
penalties.

(a) No person shall take or wound any game animal,
game bird, or game fish by use of any pit, pitfall, net,
trap, deadfall, poison, or other similar device except as
otherwise provided. From and after the date gray wolves are
removed from the list of experimental nonessential
HB0286

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0671
population, endangered species or threatened species in
Wyoming as provided by W.S. 23-1-108, gray wolves may be
taken with a trap or snare only as allowed by and in
accordance with rules and regulations of the commission.
Mountain lions may be taken with a trap or snare only as
allowed by and in accordance with rules and regulations of
the commission.

Section 3. W.S. 23-1-302(a)(xxxiii) and 23-2-307(c)
are repealed.

Section 4. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0286

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0671
Section 5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0286